Massachusetts, session 194th, H4907.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Purpose
The purpose of this act is to protect the public health, safety, and welfare by restricting
the retail sale of nitrous oxide cartridges and canisters that are commonly misused for
recreational inhalation, while preserving access for legitimate culinary, medical, dental and
industrial uses.
SECTION 2. Definitions
For the purposes of this act:
(a) "Nitrous oxide product" means any steel cartridge, cylinder, canister, tank or container
filled with nitrous oxide, including but not limited to "whippets", "whip-it chargers", "cream
chargers", or any similarly packaged product.
of 3

(b) "Retail establishment" means any business engaged in the sale of goods directly to
consumers, including smoke shops, vape shops, convenience stores, gas stations, and general
retail outlets.
(c) "Authorized seller" means (1) a licensed culinary-supply retailer whose primary
business is the sale of kitchen, baking, or food-service equipment; or (2) a licensed medical-
supply or dental-supply distributor serving healthcare and dental professionals.
SECTION 3. Restrictions on Retail Sale
(a) No retail establishment other than an authorized seller shall sell, distribute, offer for
sale, or possess for sale any nitrous oxide product.
(b) Authorized sellers may sell nitrous oxide products only to persons aged 21 or older,
and only upon examination of a valid, government-issued photo identification.
(c) Nitrous oxide products shall not be openly displayed to the general public. Such
products may only be provided upon direct request and kept behind the counter or in a non-
public storage area.
SECTION 4. Prohibited Conduct.
(a) No person shall knowingly sell or distribute nitrous oxide for the purpose of human
inhalation or recreational use.
(b) No person under 21 years of age shall purchase, attempt to purchase, possess, or
knowingly transport any nitrous oxide product, except when required for legitimate educational
or occupational purposes.
of 3

SECTION 5. Authorized sellers shall post a clearly visible sign stating: "Sale of Nitrous
Oxide to Persons Under Age 21 is Prohibited by State Law. Recreational inhalation of nitrous
oxide is dangerous and illegal."
SECTION 6. Recordkeeping Requirements
Authorized sellers shall maintain a record of each sale for a minimum of one year,
including: (1) date of sale; (2) purchaser's name and date of birth, as verified by ID; (3) quantity
sold. Records shall be made available for inspection by the Department of Public Health upon
request.
SECTION 7. Enforcement and Penalty
(a) This act shall be enforced by the Department of Public Health, local boards of health,
and municipal law-enforcement agencies.
(b) Violations shall result in the following civil penalties:
(i) a fine of up to $300 for first offenders; (ii) a fine of up to $500 for second offenders;
(iii) a fine of up to $1,000 for third and subsequent offenders, with the possibility of suspension
or revocation of state or local retail licenses.
(c) Each day of continued violation constitutes a separate offense.
SECTION 8. Preemption
Nothing in this act shall prevent a municipality from adopting stricter local regulations
governing nitrous oxide sales.
of 3